Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 6
NETWORK STANDARDS

27-50-601. Department of health care policy and financing - behavioral health network standards.

The statewide managed care system, created pursuant to part 4 of article 5 of title 25.5 and implemented by the department of health care policy and financing, shall use health facilities licensed by the department of public health and environment pursuant to article 1.5 of title 25 or licensed by the BHA pursuant to part 5 of this article 50 and individual behavioral health practitioners licensed by the department of regulatory agencies and federally qualified health centers, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(4), when creating statewide or regional behavioral health networks.

The department of health care policy and financing shall align all community-based behavioral health programs and networks with the behavioral health continuum of care, behavioral health safety net services, and care coordination provider standards created by the BHA pursuant to part 3 of this article 50.

The department of health care policy and financing shall require that all behavioral health providers enter into a contract developed pursuant to section 27-50-203 when contracting for community-based behavioral health services in the state.

The BHA shall collaborate with the department of health care policy and financing to support the early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment benefit access and provider network.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1480, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-602. Division of insurance behavioral health network standards.

The commissioner of the division of insurance in the department of regulatory agencies, while assessing and standardizing provider networks in this state pursuant to section 10-1-108, shall ensure community-based behavioral health networks align with the behavioral health continuum of care, behavioral health safety net services, and care coordination provider standards created by the BHA pursuant to part 3 of this article 50.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1481, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-603. State agency behavioral health network and program standards.

All state agencies administering community-based behavioral health programs shall ensure the community-based behavioral health programs align with the behavioral health continuum of care, behavioral health safety net services, and care coordination provider standards created by the BHA pursuant to part 3 of this article 50.

All state agencies shall use the universal contracting provisions developed pursuant to section 27-50-203 when contracting for community-based behavioral health services in the state.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1481, § 1, effective July 1.